fi: Craps-pelin mukana tulevat lisätarvikkeet: Pelimerkkien teline; Pelimerkkikaukalo; Jakajan sauva; Noppakuppi; Noppasauva (koukku); Merkit/napit; On/Off-kiekko; Sääntökirja/ohjeet; Heittopinta/taustalevy; Muu
es: Accesorios de crap incluidos: Estante de fichas; Bandeja para fichas; Bastón de crupier; Cubilete; Bastón para dados (gancho); Marcadores/botones; Disco activado/desactivado; Reglamento/instrucciones; Superficie de lanzamiento/respaldo; Otro
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za igro s kockami: Stojalo za žetone; Pladenj za žetone; Delilčeva palica; Lonček za kocke; Palica za kocke (kavelj); Označevalci/gumbi; Plošček vklop/izklop; Pravilnik/navodila; Površina za metanje/zadnja stena; Drugo
sv: Tärningstillbehör som ingår: Markerställ; Markerbricka; Croupierkratta; Tärningskopp; Tärningskratta (krok); Markörer/knappar; On/off-puck; Regelbok/instruktioner; Kastyta/stopp; Övrigt
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเกมแครปส์ที่รวมมาในชุด: ชั้นวางชิป; ถาดใส่ชิป; ไม้เขี่ยลูกเต๋า; ถ้วยเขย่าลูกเต๋า; ไม้เขี่ยลูกเต๋า (แบบตะขอ); มาร์กเกอร์/ปุ่ม; เหรียญเปิด/ปิด; กฎกติกา/คำแนะนำ; กระดานทอยเต๋า/ผนังกันลูกเต๋า; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Acessórios de jogo de dados incluídos: Suporte de fichas; Tabuleiro de fichas; Vara do croupier; Copo de dados; Vara de dados (gancho); Marcadores/botões; Disco Ativado/Desativado; Livro de regras/instruções; Superfície de lançamento/barreira; Outro
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm của trò chơi đổ xúc xắc: Giá đựng phỉnh; Khay đựng phỉnh; Gậy đẩy xúc xắc; Hộp đổ xúc xắc; Gậy gạt xúc xắc (có móc); Biểu tượng/cúc áo; Cục báo hiệu bật/tắt; Sách luật chơi/hướng dẫn; Bề mặt ném xúc xắc/chắn lưng; Khác
da: Crapstilbehør medfølger: Jetonstativ; Jetonbakke; Croupier-stav; Terningebæger; Terningestav (krog); Markører/knapper; Til/fra-puck; Regelbog/instruktioner; Kasteoverflade/bagvæg; Andet
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys krepso priedai: Žetonų laikiklis; Žetonų padėklas; Dalytojo lazdelė; Kauliukų indelis; Kauliukų lazdelė (kablys); Žymekliai / mygtukai; „Įjungta / išjungta“ ritulys; Taisyklių knyga / instrukcijos; Metimo paviršius / sienelė; Kita
zh-CN: 包括双骰子游戏配件: 筹码架; 筹码盘; 荷官木推棒; 骰盅; 骰子推棒（钩）; 标记/按钮; “开启/关闭”标志; 规则手册/说明书; 投掷面/挡板; 其他
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva kociek: Držiak na žetóny; Zásobník na žetóny; Krupiérska palica; Pohárik na kocky; Palica na kocky (hák); Značky/tlačidlá; Puk Zapnuté/Vypnuté; Pravidlá/inštrukcie; Hádzacia plocha/zadná stena; Iné
nl: Inbegrepen craps-accessoires: Ficherek; Fichebak; Dealer stick; Dobbelbeker; Dobbelstok (haak); Markers/buttons; Aan/uit-puck; Spelregelboekje/instructies; Werpoppervlak/achterwand; Overige
it: Accessori per craps inclusi: Rack per fiches; Vassoio per fiches; Rastrello da croupier; Bussolotto per dadi; Rastrello per dadi (a gancio); Segnalini/Button; Segnalino On/Off; Regolamento/Istruzioni; Superficie di lancio/Sponda posteriore; Altro
ru: Аксессуары для игры в кости: Стойка для фишек; Лоток для фишек; Стек дилера; Стакан для костей; Стик для костей (крюк); Маркеры/кнопки; Шайба Вкл/Выкл; Буклет с правилами/инструкции; Поверхность для бросания/отбойник; Другое
pl: Dołączono akcesoria do gry w craps: Stojak na żetony; Tacka na żetony; Kij krupiera; Kubek do kości; Kij do kości (z hakiem); Znaczniki/przyciski; Krążek Wł./Wył.; Instrukcja zasad/instrukcje; Powierzchnia rzutu / bandy; Inne
ko: 크랩스 액세서리 포함: 칩 랙; 칩 트레이; 딜러 스틱; 다이스 컵; 다이스 스틱(훅); 마커/버튼; 켜기/끄기 퍽; 룰북/설명서; 던지기 표면/백스톱; 기타
cs: Včetně příslušenství ke hře Skořápky: Přihrádka na žetony; Zásobník na žetony; Krupiérská hůlka; Kelímek na kostky; Hůlka na kostky (s hákem); Značky/tlačítka; Puk Zap/Vyp; Pravidla/pokyny; Hrací plocha / zadní stěna; Ostatní
nb: Inkludert terningtilbehør: Sjetongstativ; Sjetongbrett; Dealerstokk; Terningkopp; Terningstokk (krok); Markører/knapper; Av/på-puck; Regelbok/instruksjoner; Kasteflate/bakvegg; Annet
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za craps: Stalak za žetone; Ladica za žetone; Štap krupjea; Čašica za kockice; Štap za kockice (kuka); Oznake / gumbi; Pločica uključeno/isključeno; Pravilnik/upute; Površina za bacanje / graničnik; Ostalo
en: Craps accessories included: Chip rack; Chip tray; Dealer stick; Dice cup; Dice stick (hook); Markers/buttons; On/Off puck; Rulebook/instructions; Throwing surface/backstop; Other
de: Würfelsetzubehör inklusive: Chip-Ständer; Chip-Ablage; Croupier-Stick; Würfelbecher; Würfel-Stick (mit Haken); Marker/Buttons; Ein/Aus-Puck; Regelbuch/Anleitung; Wurffläche/Rückwand; Andere
zh-TW: 包含花旗骰配件: 籌碼架; 籌碼托盤; 莊家棒; 骰盅; 骰子棒 (鉤); 標記/按鈕; 開/關標記; 規則手冊/說明; 投擲表面/擋板; 其他
fr: Accessoires de craps inclus: Râtelier à jetons; Plateau à jetons; Bâton de croupier; Gobelet à dés; Bâton à dés (crochet); Marqueurs/boutons; Palet On/Off; Livret de règles/instructions; Surface de lancer/butoir; Autre
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ για ζάρια: Στάντ για μάρκες; Δίσκος για μάρκες; Μπαστούνι ντίλερ; Κύπελλο για ζάρια; Μπαστούνι για ζάρια (με γάντζο); Δείκτες/κουμπιά; Πούλι On/Off; Βιβλίο κανόνων/οδηγίες; Επιφάνεια ρίψης/προστατευτικό φόντου; Άλλο
hu: Crapt tartozékok mellékelve: Zsetontartó állvány; Zsetontálca; Krupié bot; Dobópohár; Kockagyűjtő bot (horgos); Jelölők/gombok; Be/ki (On/Off) korong; Szabálykönyv/útmutató; Dobófelület/védőfal; Egyéb
tr: Dahil edilen craps aksesuarları: Çip rafı; Çip tepsisi; Kurpiye sopası; Zar kabı; Zar sopası (kancalı); İşaretleyiciler/düğmeler; On/Off diski; Kural kitapçığı/talimatlar; Atış yüzeyi/hedef arkası; Diğer
ja: クラップスアクセサリー付き: チップラック; チップトレイ; ディーラースティック; ダイスカップ; ダイススティック (フック); マーカー / ボタン; On/Offパック; ルールブック / 説明書; 投擲面 / バックストップ; その他
pt-BR: Acessórios do jogo de dados incluídos: Organizador de fichas; Bandeja de fichas; Bastão de dealer; Copo de dados; Bastão para dados (gancho); Marcadores/botões; Disco Ligar/Desligar; Livro de regras/instruções; Superfície de lançamento/encosto; Outros
bg-BG: С включени аксесоари за крапс: Стойка за чипове; Табла за чипове; Стик за крупие; Чаша за зарове; Стик за зарове (с кука); Маркери/бутони; Шайба вкл./изкл.; Правилник/инструкции; Повърхност за хвърляне/преграда; Други
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru craps incluse: Suport pentru jetoane; Tavă pentru jetoane; Baston pentru dealer; Pahar pentru zaruri; Baston pentru zaruri (cârlig); Markere/butoane; Puc Activat/Dezactivat; Regulament/instrucțiuni; Suprafață de aruncare/opritor; Altele